Illinois, session 104th, SB911.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Cannabis Control Act is amended by changing 5Section 2 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 550/2)  (from Ch. 56 1/2, par. 702)7    Sec. 2. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8"Cannabis Control Act".9(Source: P.A. 77-758.)